Wisconsin, session 2025, SB754.
do enact as follows:SB754,11Section 1. 20.566 (1) (gc) of the statutes is created to read:SB754,3,2220.566 (1) (gc) Administration of transit authority taxes. From the moneys 3received from the appropriation account under s. 20.835 (4) (gc), the amounts in the 4schedule for the purpose of administering the transit authority taxes imposed 5under s. 77.708. Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (a), at the end of the fiscal year, the 1unencumbered balance in this appropriation account shall be transferred to the 2appropriation account under s. 20.835 (4) (gc).SB754,23Section 2. 20.835 (4) (gc) of the statutes is created to read:SB754,3,9420.835 (4) (gc) Transit authority taxes. All moneys received from the taxes 5imposed under s. 77.708, and from the appropriation account under s. 20.566 (1) 6(gc), for the purpose of distribution to the transit authorities that adopt a resolution 7imposing taxes under subch. V of ch. 77, except that 1.5 percent of those tax 8revenues collected under subch. V of ch. 77 shall be credited to the appropriation 9account under s. 20.566 (1) (gc).SB754,310Section 3. 32.02 (11) of the statutes is amended to read:SB754,3,151132.02 (11) Any housing authority created under ss. 66.1201 to 66.1211; 12redevelopment authority created under s. 66.1333; community development 13authority created under s. 66.1335; local cultural arts district created under subch. 14V of ch. 229, subject to s. 229.844 (4) (c); or local exposition district created under 15subch. II of ch. 229; or transit authority created under s. 66.1039.SB754,416Section 4. 32.05 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB754,4,141732.05 (1) (a) Except as provided under par. (b), a county board of supervisors 18or a county highway committee when so authorized by the county board of 19supervisors, a city council, a village board, a town board, a sewerage commission 20governing a metropolitan sewerage district created by ss. 200.05 or 200.21 to 21200.65, the secretary of transportation, a commission created by contract under s. 2266.0301, a joint local water authority created by contract under s. 66.0823, a transit 23authority created under s. 66.1039, a housing authority under ss. 66.1201 to 166.1211, a local exposition district created under subch. II of ch. 229, a local cultural 2arts district created under subch. V of ch. 229, a redevelopment authority under s. 366.1333 or a community development authority under s. 66.1335 shall make an 4order providing for the laying out, relocation and improvement of the public 5highway, street, alley, storm and sanitary sewers, watercourses, water transmission 6and distribution facilities, mass transit facilities, airport, or other transportation 7facilities, gas or leachate extraction systems to remedy environmental pollution 8from a solid waste disposal facility, housing project, redevelopment project, cultural 9arts facilities, exposition center or exposition center facilities which shall be known 10as the relocation order. This order shall include a map or plat showing the old and 11new locations and the lands and interests required. A copy of the order shall, 12within 20 days after its issue, be filed with the county clerk of the county wherein 13the lands are located or, in lieu of filing a copy of the order, a plat may be filed or 14recorded in accordance with s. 84.095.SB754,515Section 5. 32.07 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB754,5,31632.07 (2) The petitioner shall determine necessity if application is by the state 17or any commission, department, board or other branch of state government or by a 18city, village, town, county, school district, board, commission, public officer, 19commission created by contract under s. 66.0301, joint local water authority under 20s. 66.0823, transit authority created under s. 66.1039, redevelopment authority 21created under s. 66.1333, local exposition district created under subch. II of ch. 229, 22local cultural arts district created under subch. V of ch. 229, housing authority 23created under ss. 66.1201 to 66.1211 or for the right-of-way of a railroad up to 100 1feet in width, for a telegraph, telephone or other electric line, for the right-of-way for 2a gas pipeline, main or service or for easements for the construction of any elevated 3structure or subway for railroad purposes.SB754,64Section 6. 40.02 (28) of the statutes is amended to read:SB754,5,14540.02 (28) “Employer” means the state, including each state agency, any 6county, city, village, town, school district, other governmental unit or 7instrumentality of 2 or more units of government now existing or hereafter created 8within the state, any federated public library system established under s. 43.19 9whose territory lies within a single county with a population of 750,000 or more, a 10local exposition district created under subch. II of ch. 229, a transit authority 11created under s. 66.1039, and a long-term care district created under s. 46.2895, 12except as provided under ss. 40.51 (7) and 40.61 (3). “Employer” does not include a 13local cultural arts district created under subch. V of ch. 229. Each employer shall be 14a separate legal jurisdiction for OASDHI purposes.SB754,715Section 7. 66.0301 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB754,6,101666.0301 (1) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), in this section 17“municipality” means the state or any department or agency thereof, or any city, 18village, town, county, or school district, the opportunity schools and partnership 19programs under subch. IX of ch. 115 and subch. II of ch. 119, the superintendent of 20schools opportunity schools and partnership program under s. 119.33, or any public 21library system, public inland lake protection and rehabilitation district, sanitary 22district, farm drainage district, metropolitan sewerage district, sewer utility 23district, solid waste management system created under s. 59.70 (2), local exposition 1district created under subch. II of ch. 229, local professional baseball park district 2created under subch. III of ch. 229, local professional football stadium district 3created under subch. IV of ch. 229, local cultural arts district created under subch. 4V of ch. 229, transit authority created under s. 66.1039, long-term care district 5under s. 46.2895, water utility district, mosquito control district, municipal electric 6company, county or city transit commission, commission created by contract under 7this section, taxation district, regional planning commission, housing authority 8created under s. 66.1201, redevelopment authority created under s. 66.1333, 9community development authority created under s. 66.1335, or city-county health 10department.SB754,811Section 8. 66.1039 of the statutes is created to read:SB754,6,121266.1039 Transit authorities. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB754,6,1313(a) “Authority” means a transit authority created under this section.SB754,6,1514(b) “Bonds” means any bonds, interim certificates, notes, debentures, or other 15obligations of an authority issued under this section. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb754 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb754 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB754 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB754 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB754: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting